Utah statutes.
32A-15a-203.   Hearing on formal objections to renewal.
(1)  Upon receipt of a formal objection that meets the requirements of Section
32A-15a-202, the department shall:
(a)  issue a notice of agency action; and
(b)  serve on the retail licensee no later than 30 days before the expiration
of the retail licensee's license:
(i)  the notice of agency action; and
(ii)  a copy of the formal objection.
(2) (a)  A retail licensee against whom a notice of agency action is served
under Subsection (1) may request a hearing.
(b)  The request for hearing described in Subsection (2)(a) shall be:
(i)  in writing; and
(ii)  filed with the commission within 10 days of the day on which the notice
of agency action is served on the retail licensee.
(c)  If a retail licensee fails to file a request for hearing in accordance
with this Subsection (2), the commission may not renew the license of the
retail licensee.
(3) (a)  Upon receipt of a request for hearing meeting the requirements of
Subsection (2), the department shall immediately schedule a hearing that shall
be:
(i)  held no later than 10 days before the expiration date of the retail
licensee's license; and
(ii)  electronically recorded by the department.
(b)  The retail licensee or an objecting governmental entity, at its own
expense, may have a reporter approved by the department prepare a transcript
from the department's record of the hearing.
(c) (i)  The department shall present information at the hearing that supports
a finding that nuisance activities occurred.
(ii)  The information described in Subsection (3)(c)(i) shall be made a part
of the record of the hearing.
(d)  The retail licensee shall:
(i)  have the opportunity to challenge or explain whether any of the nuisance
activities that form the basis for the formal objection occurred; and
(ii)  be permitted to:
(A)  testify;
(B)  present evidence; and
(C)  comment on the issues at the hearing.
(4) (a)  Any hearing held under this chapter shall be conducted under the
authority of the commission.
(b)  The commission is responsible for rendering a final order on whether a
retail licensee's license shall be renewed.
(c)  Notwithstanding Subsections (4)(a) and (b), the commission may appoint
necessary hearing examiners to administer the hearing process.
(d)  The commission or the hearing examiner appointed by the commission shall
serve as the presiding officer at a hearing held under this section.
(e)  The presiding officer at a hearing held under this section:
(i)  shall evaluate:
(A)  the information presented at the hearing in support of the formal
objection; and
(B)  any explanation and evidence offered by the retail licensee; and
(ii)  may consider such factors as:
(A)  the length of time the retail licensee has operated the licensed
premises;
(B)  the condition of the premises;
(C)  whether the retail licensee knew or should have known of the nuisance
activities in question;
(D)  whether the retail licensee failed to:
(I)  make a substantial effort to correct the nuisance activities; and
(II)  work with law enforcement to curtail the nuisance activity;
(E)  whether the nuisance activities have been ongoing or temporary;
(F)  whether the retail licensee or the licensee’s employees:
(I)  initiated contact with the law enforcement agency on the nuisance
activities; and  (II)  cooperated with the law enforcement agency's
investigation; and
(G)  whether prior efforts to stop the nuisance activities by the community or
the retail licensee have been unsuccessful.
(5)  An order issued under this section shall:
(a)  be based on the evidence presented at the hearing; and
(b)  state whether:
(i)  the continued operation of the licensed establishment will endanger the
public health, peace, safety, welfare, or morals of the community; and
(ii)  the license should or should not be renewed.
(6) (a)  If the presiding officer is a hearing examiner appointed by the
commission, the hearing officer shall issue a signed order in writing that:
(i)  complies with Subsection (5);
(ii)  recommends to the commission whether the license should or should not be
renewed;
(iii)  states the reasons for the hearing officer's decision; and
(iv)  notifies the retail licensee and the objecting governmental entity that
the hearing examiner's order will be considered by the commission at the next
regularly scheduled meeting of the commission.
(b)  The department shall promptly mail a copy of the hearing examiner's order
to:
(i)  the retail licensee; and
(ii)  any objecting governmental entity.
(c)  The commission at its next regularly scheduled meeting after receipt of a
hearing examiner’s order, shall decide whether to renew or not renew the
license on the basis of:
(i)  the record and evidence presented at the hearing; and
(ii)  the hearing examiner's recommendation.
(7) (a)  As an alternative to ordering in accordance with this section that a
retail license not be renewed, the commission may conditionally renew a retail
license by requiring that:
(i)  the licensee and the licensed premises be closely monitored during the
licensing year by:
(A)  the department;
(B)  local government officials; and
(C)  law enforcement; and
(ii)  the matter be reviewed prior to the next renewal period.
(b)  The commission may conditionally renew a retail license contingent on any
person listed in Subsection (7)(b)(ii) divesting all interest in the retail
licensed business if:
(i)  the retail licensee is a partnership, corporation, or limited liability
company; and
(ii)  the formal objection filed under this section if filed solely on the
basis of a felony conviction:
(A)  of:
(I)  a partner;
(II)  a managing agent;
(III)  a manager;
(IV)  an officer;
(V)  a director;
(VI)  a stockholder who holds at least 20% of the total issued and outstanding
stock of a corporate licensee; or
(VII)  a member who owns at least 20% of a limited liability company licensee;
and
(B)  for illegal activity that occurred off of the licensed premises.
(8) (a)  In accordance with this section, the commission shall issue a written
order setting forth the commission's decision and the reason for the
commission's decision.
(b)  The order described in Subsection (8)(a) is considered final on the date
the order becomes effective.
(c)  The department shall serve a copy of the order on the retail licensee.
(9)  A licensee whose license has not been renewed by order of the commission
may seek judicial review under the procedures provided in Section 32A-1-120.
(10)  A licensee whose license is not renewed may not reapply for a license
under this title for three years from the date the license is not renewed.
